Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 6. Time for Opening of Road

§ 765.
Time limits.

When the Supreme or Superior Court orders a highway to be laid out or altered, it shall fix the time within which owners of lands taken shall remove their buildings, fences, timber, wood, and trees, and open the land for working, and the time when it shall be opened to be occupied; which time, without consent of the owner, shall not be less than two months, nor less than six months if the lands taken have buildings.
The court may order sections of a highway to be completed in different times as circumstances may require, but the whole period shall not be less than one year.
When the court orders the building of a bridge, it shall fix the time within which it shall be completed, which shall not be less than six months.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 766.
Extension of time.

The selectboard of a town in which a highway or bridge is ordered to be built may apply by petition to the court making the order to extend the time for completing the highway or bridge.
Notice shall be given to one or more of the original petitioners for the highway or bridge, and one or more of the selectboard of any other town, in which the highway or bridge is partly located, by serving the petition on them with a citation for that purpose, at least 12 days before the term of the court to which the petition is returnable, and the court may extend the time as the circumstances of the case require.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.